Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.220

Remedies and penalties in chapter nonexclusive and cumulative.

The remedies and penalties provided for in this chapter are nonexclusive and cumulative and do not affect any other actions or proceedings.

[ 1986 c 299 s 22.]